Idaho statutes. Title 5 PROCEEDINGS IN CIVIL ACTIONS IN COURTS OF RECORD
Chapter 3
PARTIES TO ACTIONS

Section.

§ 5-301. Real party in interest. [Repealed.]

§ 5-302. Assignment of thing in action.

In the case of an assignment of a thing in action, the action by the assignee is without prejudice to any set-off, or other defense existing at the time of, or before, notice of the assignment; but this section does not apply to a negotiable instrument transferred, in good faith and upon good consideration, before maturity.

§ 5-302. Assignment of thing in action.

In the case of an assignment of a thing in action, the action by the assignee is without prejudice to any set-off, or other defense existing at the time of, or before, notice of the assignment; but this section does not apply to a negotiable instrument transferred, in good faith and upon good consideration, before maturity.

§ 5-303. Actions by executors, trustees and board of control. [Repealed.]

§ 5-304. Married women as parties.

A woman may while married sue and be sued in the same manner as if she were single: provided, that except in actions between husband and wife the husband shall not be chargeable in any manner with the wife’s costs or other expenses of suit.

Former Law.

A married woman may contract debts for the use and benefit of her separate property, or for her own use and benefit, and, thereby, charge her separate property. Dernham v. Rowley, 4 Idaho 753, 44 P. 643 (1896). Former Law.

Under Rev. Stat. 1887, § 4093 (repealed by implication), husband was required to be joined with wife when she had a cause of action for personal injuries. Lindsay v. Oregon S. L. R.R., 13 Idaho 477, 90 P. 984 (1907) (see Compiler’s Notes, above).

§ 5-305. Husband and wife sued together.

If a husband and wife be sued together the wife may defend her own right, and if the husband neglect to defend she may defend for his right also.

§ 5-306. Infants and insane persons — Guardians ad litem.

When an infant or an insane or incompetent person is a party, he must appear either by his general guardian or by a guardian ad litem appointed by the court in which the action is pending in each case. A guardian ad litem may be appointed in any case when it is deemed by the court in which the action or proceeding is prosecuted, or by a judge thereof, expedient, to represent the infant, insane or incompetent person in the action or proceeding, notwithstanding he may have a general guardian and may have appeared by him.

§ 5-307. Appointment of guardian ad litem. [Repealed.]

§ 5-308. Action for seduction.

An unmarried female may prosecute, as plaintiff, an action for her own seduction, and may recover therein such damages, pecuniary or exemplary, as are assessed in her favor.

§ 5-309. Action for seduction — Prosecution by parent or guardian.

The parents may prosecute as plaintiffs for the seduction of a daughter under the age of majority at the time of the seduction, and the guardian for the seduction of a ward under the age of majority at the time of seduction, though the daughter or ward be not living with or in the service of the plaintiff or plaintiffs at the time of the seduction, or afterward, and there be no loss of service, but if either the father or mother be dead or has abandoned his or her family, the other is entitled to sue alone.

§ 5-310. Action for injury to unmarried child.

The parents may maintain an action for the injury of an unmarried minor child, and for the injury of a minor child who was married at the time of his injury and whose spouse died as a result of the same occurrence and who leaves no issue, and a guardian for the injury of his ward, when such injury is caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another, but if either the father or mother be dead or has abandoned his or her family, the other is entitled to sue alone. Such action may be maintained against the person causing the injury, or if such person be employed by another person, who is responsible for his conduct, also against such other person.

§ 5-310. Action for injury to unmarried child.

The parents may maintain an action for the injury of an unmarried minor child, and for the injury of a minor child who was married at the time of his injury and whose spouse died as a result of the same occurrence and who leaves no issue, and a guardian for the injury of his ward, when such injury is caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another, but if either the father or mother be dead or has abandoned his or her family, the other is entitled to sue alone. Such action may be maintained against the person causing the injury, or if such person be employed by another person, who is responsible for his conduct, also against such other person.

§ 5-311. Suit for wrongful death by or against heirs or personal representatives — Damages.

When the death of a person is caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another, his or her heirs or personal representatives on their behalf may maintain an action for damages against the person causing the death, or in case of the death of such wrongdoer, against the personal representative of such wrongdoer, whether the wrongdoer dies before or after the death of the person injured. If any other person is responsible for any such wrongful act or neglect, the action may also be maintained against such other person, or in case of his or her death, his or her personal representatives. In every action under this section, such damages may be given as under all the circumstances of the case as may be just.

For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, and subsection (2) of section 5-327, Idaho Code, “heirs” means:

Those persons who would be entitled to succeed to the property of the decedent according to the provisions of subsection (22) of section 15-1-201, Idaho Code.

Whether or not qualified under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the decedent’s spouse, children, stepchildren, parents, and, when partly or wholly dependent on the decedent for support or services, any blood relatives and adoptive brothers and sisters. It includes the illegitimate child of a mother, but not the illegitimate child of the father unless the father has recognized a responsibility for the child’s support.

“Support” includes contributions in kind as well as money.

“Services” means tasks, usually of a household nature, regularly performed by the decedent that will be a necessary expense to the heirs of the decedent. These services may vary according to the identity of the decedent and heir and shall be determined under the particular facts of each case.

Whether or not qualified under subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b) of this section, the putative spouse of the decedent, if he or she was dependent on the decedent for support or services. As used in this subsection, “putative spouse” means the surviving spouse of a void or voidable marriage who is found by the court to have believed in good faith that the marriage to the decedent was valid.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to change or modify the definition of “heirs” under any other provision of law.

Parties Defendant.

A railroad corporation is liable for damages to employee injured through the negligence of its agents or servants who are invested with a controlling and superior duty in the management of the business of the corporation. Palmer v. Utah & N.R.R., 2 Idaho 315, 13 P. 425 (1887).

Parties Defendant.

A railroad corporation is liable for damages to employee injured through the negligence of its agents or servants who are invested with a controlling and superior duty in the management of the business of the corporation. Palmer v. Utah & N.R.R., 2 Idaho 315, 13 P. 425 (1887).

Parties Plaintiff.

Where, at the time of the accident driver of automobile was neither an agent, employee nor servant of a specific company, but was merely driving toward a town in an effort to report for work and the use and operation of his automobile in that effort was entirely his choice and under his complete control, he was not a person employed by another person who was responsible for his conduct within the wrongful death statute; a prospective employer is not liable for any negligence on the part of such driver in the operation of his car while driving toward the place of intended employment. Lallatin v. Terry, 81 Idaho 238, 340 P.2d 112 (1959). Parties Plaintiff.

Guardians of minor children of deceased employee have right to maintain action against third person. Workmen’s Comp. Exch. v. Chicago, M., St. P. & Pac. R.R., 45 F.2d 885 (D. Idaho 1930).

The fact that the wife predeceased the husband did not preclude a daughter as wife’s “heir” from recovering for wife’s death, under this section, on the theory that immediately on the wife’s death, the right of action was given to the husband, under the community property laws, and that such right of action was completely extinguished by the husband’s subsequent death. Little v. Ireland, 30 F. Supp. 653 (D. Idaho 1939).

A 33-year-old daughter was not entitled to recover damages for the death of her 54-year-old mother, for whose death the father had recovered $10,000, where the daughter was married, lived with her own family, and there was no showing of a single visit by the daughter at the maternal home or of the relation existing between the daughter and the mother. Hepp v. Ader, 64 Idaho 240, 130 P.2d 859 (1942).

Where mother and husband were the only heirs of deceased, who was killed by husband, the mother was entitled to prosecute the action under this section. Russell v. Cox, 65 Idaho 534, 148 P.2d 221 (1944).

A foreign administratrix cannot bring a wrongful death action in Idaho, since only residents of the state can serve as administrator or administratrix in Idaho. Barnes v. Union Pac. R.R., 139 F. Supp. 198 (D. Idaho 1956).

As the Idaho death statute is a new right of action to a designated class of persons, i.e., the decedent’s heirs or personal representatives, the determination of who must bring the action depends upon substantive law and in a diversity action in federal district court the determination whether a third person was an indispensable party plaintiff to such action would have to be determined by the law of Idaho. Campbell v. Pacific Fruit Express Co., 148 F. Supp. 209 (D. Idaho 1957).

Since the right of action is not given to the decedent’s estate, but is granted only to his heirs, denial to executor of right of recovery was not a deprival of equal protection of the law. Moon v. Bullock, 65 Idaho 594, 151 P.2d 765 (1944), overruled on other grounds, Doggett v. Boiler Eng’r & Supply Co., 93 Idaho 890, 477 P.2d 511 (1970).

Where the twenty-year-old decedent was an adult under the 1972 probate law, his wife and minor child were the proper parties to bring suit under this section. Harrigfeld v. District Court of Seventh Judicial Dist., 95 Idaho 540, 511 P.2d 822 (1973).

Only those who qualify as “heirs” under the intestate succession statute are proper parties plaintiff in wrongful death actions under this section. Nebeker v. Piper Aircraft Corp., 113 Idaho 609, 747 P.2d 18 (1987).

§ 5-312 — 5-318. Joinder of parties — Unity of interest — Nonconsenting parties — Several liability — Co-tenants. [Repealed.]

§ 5-319. Death or transfer of interest — Procedure — Actions by or against public officers.

An action or proceeding does not abate by the death or any disability of a party, or by the transfer of any interest therein, if the cause of action or proceeding survive or continue. In case of the death or any disability of a party, the court, on motion, may allow the action or proceeding to be continued by or against his representative or successor in interest. In case of any other transfer of interest the action or proceeding may be continued in the name of the original party, or the court may allow the person to whom the transfer is made to be substituted in the action or proceeding. An action or proceeding brought by or against any public officer in his official capacity and which action or proceeding is pending at the time of his death, resignation, retirement or removal from office does not abate. The court on its own motion or on motion for substitution may substitute the successor in office and allow the action or proceeding to be continued against such successor.

§ 5-320. Substitution of defendant. [Repealed.]

§ 5-321. Interpleader.

In an action commenced by a person possessing specific personal property which is claimed by two (2) or more persons to determine to which the property should be delivered, or in an action for the recovery of specific personal property where a third person demands of the defendant the same property, the court in its discretion, on motion of the person possessing the property, and notice to the persons claiming the property, whether or not they are parties to the action, may, before answer, make an order discharging the person possessing the property from liability to claiming persons and interplead such claiming person or persons in the action. The order shall not be made except on the condition that the person possessing the property shall deliver the property or its value to the clerk of the court or to such custodian as the court may direct, and unless it appears from the affidavit of the person possessing the property, filed with the clerk with the motion, that such person or persons claiming makes or make such demand without collusion with the party possessing the property. The affidavit of such third person as to whether he makes such demand of the defendant may be read on the hearing of the motion.

A person possessing the property who follows the procedure set forth above may insert in his motion for interpleader a request for allowance of his costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred in such action. In ordering the discharge of such party, the court may, in its discretion, award such party his costs and reasonable attorney fees from the amount in dispute which has been deposited with the court. At the time of final judgment in the action, the court may make such further provision for assumption of such costs and attorney fees by one (1) or more of the adverse claimants. At the same time, the court may, in its discretion, award to the person determined to be entitled to the property his costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees against an unsuccessful claimant if the claim asserted by said claimant was frivolous or without substantial merit.

§ 5-321. Interpleader.

In an action commenced by a person possessing specific personal property which is claimed by two (2) or more persons to determine to which the property should be delivered, or in an action for the recovery of specific personal property where a third person demands of the defendant the same property, the court in its discretion, on motion of the person possessing the property, and notice to the persons claiming the property, whether or not they are parties to the action, may, before answer, make an order discharging the person possessing the property from liability to claiming persons and interplead such claiming person or persons in the action. The order shall not be made except on the condition that the person possessing the property shall deliver the property or its value to the clerk of the court or to such custodian as the court may direct, and unless it appears from the affidavit of the person possessing the property, filed with the clerk with the motion, that such person or persons claiming makes or make such demand without collusion with the party possessing the property. The affidavit of such third person as to whether he makes such demand of the defendant may be read on the hearing of the motion.

A person possessing the property who follows the procedure set forth above may insert in his motion for interpleader a request for allowance of his costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred in such action. In ordering the discharge of such party, the court may, in its discretion, award such party his costs and reasonable attorney fees from the amount in dispute which has been deposited with the court. At the time of final judgment in the action, the court may make such further provision for assumption of such costs and attorney fees by one (1) or more of the adverse claimants. At the same time, the court may, in its discretion, award to the person determined to be entitled to the property his costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees against an unsuccessful claimant if the claim asserted by said claimant was frivolous or without substantial merit.

Former § 5-321, which comprised R.S., R.C., & C.L., § 4110; C.S., § 6654; I.C.A., § 5-321, was repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 164, § 1.
CASE NOTES

§ 5-322. Intervention. [Repealed.]

§ 5-323. Actions against partners. [Repealed.]

§ 5-324. Additional parties. [Repealed.]

§ 5-325. Unknown owners or heirs as parties. [Repealed.]

§ 5-326. Unknown owners or heirs — Effect of judgments and decrees.

Judgments and decrees rendered in actions or proceedings when persons have been made parties and served by publication of summons, shall have the same effect in all respects as if such persons had been made parties by their own proper names, and had been served by publication and mailing of summons according to the statutes in such case made and provided. If in such action or proceeding persons are made parties by the designation of unknown heirs as aforesaid, the judgment or decree shall be conclusive as to all heirs of such deceased party. When in any action or proceeding persons are made defendants by the designation of unknown devisees as aforesaid, the judgment or decree in such proceeding shall be conclusive as against all devisees of such deceased person. When in any action or proceeding persons are made defendants by the designation of unknown owners as aforesaid, the judgment or decree rendered in such action or proceeding shall be conclusive as against the world, including all contingent interests in the controversy and persons not in being who may have an interest or contingent interest therein.

§ 5-327. Personal injuries — Property damage — Death of wrongdoer — Death of injured party — Survival of action.

Causes of action arising out of injury to the person or property, or death, caused by the wrongful act or negligence of another, except actions for slander or libel, shall not abate upon the death of the wrongdoer, and each injured person or the personal representative of each one meeting death, as above stated, shall have a cause of action against the personal representative of the wrongdoer; provided, however, the punitive damages or exemplary damages shall not be awarded nor penalties adjudged in any such action; provided, however, that the injured person shall not recover judgment except upon some competent, satisfactory evidence corroborating the testimony of said injured person regarding negligence and proximate cause.

A cause of action for personal injury or property damage caused by the wrongful act or negligence of another shall not abate upon the death of the injured person from causes not related to the wrongful act or negligence. Provided however, that the damages that may be recovered in such action are expressly limited to those for: (i) medical expenses actually incurred, (ii) other out-of-pocket expenses actually incurred, and (iii) loss of earnings actually suffered, prior to the death of such injured person and as a result of the wrongful act or negligence. Such action shall be commenced or, if already commenced at the time of the death of the injured person, shall be thereafter prosecuted by the personal representative of the estate of the deceased person or, if there be no personal representative appointed, then by those persons who would be entitled to succeed to the property of the deceased person according to the provisions of section 5-311(2)(a), Idaho Code.

§ 5-327. Personal injuries — Property damage — Death of wrongdoer — Death of injured party — Survival of action.

Causes of action arising out of injury to the person or property, or death, caused by the wrongful act or negligence of another, except actions for slander or libel, shall not abate upon the death of the wrongdoer, and each injured person or the personal representative of each one meeting death, as above stated, shall have a cause of action against the personal representative of the wrongdoer; provided, however, the punitive damages or exemplary damages shall not be awarded nor penalties adjudged in any such action; provided, however, that the injured person shall not recover judgment except upon some competent, satisfactory evidence corroborating the testimony of said injured person regarding negligence and proximate cause.

A cause of action for personal injury or property damage caused by the wrongful act or negligence of another shall not abate upon the death of the injured person from causes not related to the wrongful act or negligence. Provided however, that the damages that may be recovered in such action are expressly limited to those for: (i) medical expenses actually incurred, (ii) other out-of-pocket expenses actually incurred, and (iii) loss of earnings actually suffered, prior to the death of such injured person and as a result of the wrongful act or negligence. Such action shall be commenced or, if already commenced at the time of the death of the injured person, shall be thereafter prosecuted by the personal representative of the estate of the deceased person or, if there be no personal representative appointed, then by those persons who would be entitled to succeed to the property of the deceased person according to the provisions of section 5-311(2)(a), Idaho Code.

§ 5-328. State a party defendant in suit affecting title to real or personal property.

In any action or proceeding, whether judicial or summary, affecting the title to real or personal property in which the state of Idaho has, or claims to have an interest, lien or claim, the state of Idaho may be made a party defendant to such action or proceeding, and its rights or interests determined; provided that a judicial sale or a trustee sale under a deed of trust shall have the same effect respecting the discharge of the property from claims or encumbrances held by the state of Idaho as may be provided with respect to such matters by law as to other persons, and provided further that in no event shall any money judgment or cost be rendered against the state of Idaho in such action or proceeding.

§ 5-329. Service of process upon attorney general.

Process or notice as required by law in any such proceeding, whether judicial or summary, may be made upon the attorney general of the state of Idaho in the same manner and within the same time limited by law with respect to other parties to any such action or proceeding.

§ 5-330. Immunity of persons giving emergency first aid from damage claim.

That no action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in any court of this state against any person or persons, or group of persons, who in good faith and without compensation, being at, or stopping at the scene of an accident or emergency, offers and administers emergency first aid or emergency medical attention to any person or persons injured in such accident or emergency unless it can be shown that the person or persons offering or administering emergency first aid or emergency medical attention, is guilty of gross negligence in the care or treatment of said injured person or persons or has treated them in a grossly negligent manner. The immunity described herein shall cease upon delivery of the injured person to either a generally recognized hospital for treatment of ill or injured persons, or upon assumption of treatment in the office or facility of any person undertaking to treat said injured person or persons, or upon delivery of said injured person or persons into custody of an ambulance attendant.

§ 5-331. Immunity of volunteer ambulance attendant.

No action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in any court of this state against any person or persons, or group of persons, including volunteer ambulance attendants, who offers and administers first aid or emergency medical attention as a part of his volunteer service as an ambulance attendant to any person or persons utilizing the volunteer services and facilities, unless it can be shown that the person or persons offering or administering first aid or emergency medical attention is guilty of gross negligence in the care or treatment offered or administered, or has treated them in a grossly negligent manner. The immunity described herein shall cease upon delivery of the injured or treated person to either a generally recognized hospital for treatment of ill or injured persons, or upon assumption of treatment in the office or facility of any person undertaking to treat said ill or injured person or persons.

§ 5-332. Consent for emergency medical treatment.

The authorization or refusal of consent for emergency medical treatment under section 5-330 or 5-331, Idaho Code, shall be governed by chapter 45, title 39, Idaho Code.

§ 5-333. Immunity of underground mine rescue participants, their employers and representatives.

No person or persons engaged in underground mine rescue or recovery work who, in good faith, render(s) emergency care, rescue, assistance or recovery services at the scene of any emergency in a mine in this state, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or omission by such person(s) in rendering such emergency care, rescue, assistance or recovery service.

Neither the employer nor a labor organization which represents any person(s) entitled to the immunity provided in this act shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or omission of any person(s) entitled to such immunity.

§ 5-334. Act or omission preventing abortion not actionable.

A cause of action shall not arise, and damages shall not be awarded, on behalf of any person, based on the claim that but for the act or omission of another, a person would not have been permitted to have been born alive but would have been aborted.

The provisions of this section shall not preclude causes of action based on claims that, but for a wrongful act or omission, fertilization would not have occurred, maternal death would not have occurred or disability, disease, defect or deficiency of an individual prior to birth would have been prevented, cured or ameliorated in a manner that preserved the health and life of the affected individual.

§ 5-335. General rules of pleading — Claims for relief.

A pleading which sets forth a claim for relief, whether an original claim, counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim, shall contain (1) if the court has limited jurisdiction, a short and plain statement of the grounds upon which the court’s jurisdiction depends, (2) a short and plain statement of the claims showing that the pleader is entitled to relief, and (3) a demand for judgment for the relief to which the pleader deems himself or herself entitled. Relief in the alternative or of several different types may be demanded. In any action for recovery because of personal injury or death, the claim for relief shall not specify the amount of damages claimed, but shall, instead, contain a general allegation of damage and shall state that the damages claimed are within any minimum or maximum jurisdictional limits of the court to which the pleading is addressed. At any time after service of the pleading, the defendant may, by special interrogatory, demand a statement of the amount of damages claimed by the plaintiff, which shall be answered within fifteen (15) days. The information provided in the response to the special interrogatory shall not be admissible into evidence at trial, nor shall it be communicated to the jury by argument or otherwise, nor shall it affect or limit the verdict rendered by the jury or the judgment issued by the court, in accordance with Idaho rule of civil procedure 54(c).

§ 5-336. Demand for judgment — Default judgments.

A judgment by default shall not be different in kind from or exceed in the amount that prayed for in the demand for judgment. Except as to a party against whom a judgment is entered by default, every final judgment shall grant the relief to which the party in whose favor it is rendered is entitled, even if the party has not demanded such relief in his pleading. Provided, however, if a judgment by default is entered in any claim for relief for personal injury or death pursuant to Idaho rule of civil procedure 8(a)(1), after default is entered, the court shall conduct such hearings or order such reference as it deems necessary and proper pursuant to Idaho rule of civil procedure 55(b)(2) to determine the appropriate amount of damages.

§ 5-337. Immunity for use of automated external defibrillator (AED).

As used in this section, “defibrillator” means an automated external defibrillator (AED).

In order to promote public health and safety:

A person or entity who acquires a defibrillator shall ensure that:

Expected defibrillator users receive training in its use and care equivalent to the CPR and AED training of the American heart association, the American red cross or similar entities;

The defibrillator is maintained and tested by the owner according to the manufacturer’s operational guidelines;

Any person who renders emergency care or treatment to a person in cardiac arrest by using a defibrillator must activate the emergency medical services system as soon as possible, and must report any clinical use of the defibrillator to the prescribing physician.

Any person or entity who acquires a defibrillator shall notify an agent of the emergency communications system or emergency vehicle dispatch center of the existence, location and type of defibrillator.

Any person who reasonably renders emergency care using a defibrillator, without remuneration or expectation of remuneration, at the scene of an accident or emergency to a victim of the accident or emergency shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from the person’s acts or omissions.
(3)(a) Any person who reasonably renders emergency care using a defibrillator, without remuneration or expectation of remuneration, at the scene of an accident or emergency to a victim of the accident or emergency shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from the person’s acts or omissions.

No cause of action shall be maintained against a licensed physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or nurse, or against an emergency medical technician, fireman, peace officer, ambulance attendant or other person trained to use a defibrillator, or against a person or entity who acquires or maintains a defibrillator which arises from the reasonable use of a defibrillator in an emergency setting and no cause of action shall be maintained against a physician who wrote a prescription for the defibrillator.

This immunity from civil liability does not apply if the acts or omissions amount to gross negligence or willful or wanton or reckless misconduct.

A defibrillator acquired pursuant to a prescription and possessed in compliance with subsection (2) of this section is exempt from the provisions of chapter 10, title 56, Idaho Code.

§ 5-338. Immunity of donors of wild game meat.

A donor of wild game meat for free use by a charitable organization is immune from civil or criminal liability arising from an injury or death attributable to the nature, age, condition or packaging of the donated wild game meat if the injury or death is not a result of the gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct of the donor and the donated wild game meat is prepared and packaged by a commercial butcher, commercial slaughterhouse, commercial meat processor or similar entity subject by law to regular state or federal inspection and licensing.

A charitable organization that receives, distributes or serves donated wild game meat is immune from civil or criminal liability arising from an injury or death attributable to the condition of the meat if:

The charitable organization uses appropriate food storage and handling equipment to provide for the safe and sanitary storage and/or service of the wild game meat;

The charitable organization accepts only wild game meat prepared and packaged by a commercial butcher, commercial slaughterhouse, commercial meat processor, or similar entity subject by law to regular state or federal inspection and licensing;

The charitable organization inspects the donated wild game meat in a reasonable manner and finds it to be apparently fit for human consumption at the time of distribution or service;

The charitable organization has no actual or constructive knowledge at the time the wild game meat is distributed or served that it is adulterated, tainted, contaminated, or would be harmful to the health or well-being of a person eating it; and

An injury or death caused by eating the wild game meat is not a proximate cause of the gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct of the charitable organization.

For purposes of this section:

“Charitable organization” means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under the provisions of sections 501(c)(3) and 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended.

“Donor” means a person, retailer, commercial butcher, commercial slaughterhouse, commercial meat processor, or similar entity under state supervision, and the Idaho fish and game department in its capacity as a donor of unlawfully taken or unclaimed wildlife pursuant to section 36-1304, Idaho Code.

“Wild game meat” means any raw, cooked, processed, or prepared edible meat from a game animal killed in the wild and used or intended for use in whole or in part for human consumption and which is exempt from the inspection requirements of the federal wholesome meat act; provided however, that wild game salami may not be donated. Wild game meat shall not be considered “adulterated” as that term is defined in chapter 1, title 37, Idaho Code, and IDAPA 16.02.19, merely because the meat is the product of a game animal killed in the wild and not slaughtered by a butcher in a state or federally regulated food processing establishment. Wild game meat shall be considered “wildlife” as that term is used in IDAPA 16.02.19, and shall be handled, prepared and served accordingly if the charitable organization is a food establishment as defined in the rules. «Title 5»«Ch. 3»«§ 5-338»

§ 5-338. Immunity of donors of wild game meat.

A donor of wild game meat for free use by a charitable organization is immune from civil or criminal liability arising from an injury or death attributable to the nature, age, condition or packaging of the donated wild game meat if the injury or death is not a result of the gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct of the donor and the donated wild game meat is prepared and packaged by a commercial butcher, commercial slaughterhouse, commercial meat processor or similar entity subject by law to regular state or federal inspection and licensing.

A charitable organization that receives, distributes or serves donated wild game meat is immune from civil or criminal liability arising from an injury or death attributable to the condition of the meat if:

The charitable organization uses appropriate food storage and handling equipment to provide for the safe and sanitary storage and/or service of the wild game meat;

The charitable organization accepts only wild game meat prepared and packaged by a commercial butcher, commercial slaughterhouse, commercial meat processor, or similar entity subject by law to regular state or federal inspection and licensing;

The charitable organization inspects the donated wild game meat in a reasonable manner and finds it to be apparently fit for human consumption at the time of distribution or service;

The charitable organization has no actual or constructive knowledge at the time the wild game meat is distributed or served that it is adulterated, tainted, contaminated, or would be harmful to the health or well-being of a person eating it; and

An injury or death caused by eating the wild game meat is not a proximate cause of the gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct of the charitable organization.

For purposes of this section:

“Charitable organization” means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under the provisions of sections 501(c)(3) and 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended.

“Donor” means a person, retailer, commercial butcher, commercial slaughterhouse, commercial meat processor, or similar entity under state supervision, and the Idaho fish and game department in its capacity as a donor of unlawfully taken or unclaimed wildlife pursuant to section 36-1304, Idaho Code.

§ 5-339. Immunity of food donor and food bank.

It shall not be negligence for a donor of food to donate food apparently fit for human consumption at the time of its donation solely because:

The label on the food is missing or the food is otherwise misbranded; or

The food, if offered for sale commercially, would not be readily marketable because of appearance or grade, or because it is surplus.

A food bank that receives and distributes food apparently fit for human consumption shall not be found negligent or liable for damages caused by food it distributes if:

The food bank inspects the food received in a reasonable manner and finds it to be apparently fit for human consumption at the time of distribution;

The food bank has no actual or constructive knowledge at the time the food is distributed that it is adulterated, tainted, contaminated, or would be harmful to the health or well-being of an individual consuming it; and

The injury or death is not proximately caused by the misconduct of the food bank.

It shall not be negligence for a food bank to distribute food apparently fit for human consumption at the time of its distribution solely because:

The label on the food is missing or the food is otherwise misbranded; or

The food, if offered for sale commercially, would not be readily marketable because of appearance or grade, or because it is surplus.

For purposes of this section:

“Donor” includes a person, farmer, rancher, retailer, slaughterhouse under state supervision, freight company, distributor, wholesaler, meat processor, seafood processor, or similar entity, and a person who acts in a commercial capacity as a manufacturer, packer, processor, bottler, or similar entity, even if that activity is the person’s primary activity.

“Food” means any raw, cooked, processed, or prepared edible substance, ice, beverage, or ingredient used or intended for use in whole or in part for human consumption.

“Food bank” means a nonprofit organization that operates principally to collect, inspect, and salvage donated food for free distribution either to needy persons or to nonprofit organizations for free distribution to needy persons. In this paragraph, “nonprofit organization” means an organization recognized by the state or federal government as a nonprofit organization.

This section does not apply to donations of wild game meat to charitable institutions. Liability and immunity for donations of wild game meat to charitable institutions shall be determined according to section 5-338, Idaho Code.